Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1076
Purposes and powers of society.

(1) A society shall operate for the benefit of its members and their beneficiaries by:

(a) Providing benefits as specified in section 44-1087; and

(b) Operating for one or more social, intellectual, educational, charitable, benevolent, moral, fraternal, patriotic, or religious purposes for the benefit of its members, which may also be extended to others.

Such purposes may be carried out directly by the society or indirectly through subsidiary corporations or affiliated organizations.

(2) Every society shall have the power to adopt and promulgate laws and rules for the government of the society, the admission of its members, and the management of its affairs. It shall have the power to change, alter, add to, or amend such laws and rules and shall have such other powers as are necessary and incidental to carrying into effect the objects and purposes of the society.

Laws 1985, LB 508, § 5.